Vermont, session 2025-2026, H362.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds:
VT LEG #380973 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.362
2025 Page 2 of 18
(1) Deliberations of the Truth and Reconciliation Commission are not
subject to Vermont’s Open Meeting law, raising transparency concerns.
(2) The process for State-recognition of Native American Indian tribes
has been flawed, excluding key voices, particularly those of the Odanak
Abenaki.
(3) The State’s recognition of certain Native American Indian tribes has
perpetuated cultural erasure and undermined authentic Indigenous heritage.
(4) Effective truth and reconciliation processes prioritize transparency,
community inclusion, and restorative justice, as outlined in the United Nations
Declaration of the Rights of Indigenous People.
Sec. 2 1 V.S.A. § 852 is amended to read:
§ 852. VERMONT COMMISSION ON NATIVE AMERICAN AFFAIRS
ESTABLISHED; AUTHORITY
(a) In order to recognize the historic and cultural contributions of Native
Americans to Vermont, to protect and strengthen their heritage, and to address
their needs in State policy, programs, and actions, there is hereby established
the Vermont Commission on Native American Affairs (the “Commission”).
(b) The Commission shall be composed of nine members appointed by the
Governor for staggered two-year terms from a list of candidates compiled by
the Division for Historic Preservation. The Governor shall appoint members
who have been residents of Vermont for a minimum of three years and reflect
VT LEG #380973 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.362
2025 Page 3 of 18
a diversity of affiliations and geographic locations in Vermont. A member
may serve for no not more than two consecutive terms, unless there are
insufficient eligible candidates. No individual affiliated with or employed by a
group or band seeking formal State recognition as a Native American Indian
tribe shall serve on the Commission during the pendency of the application.
The Division shall compile a list of candidates from the following:
* * *
Sec. 3. 1 V.S.A. § 853 is amended to read:
§ 853. CRITERIA AND PROCESS FOR STATE RECOGNITION OF
NATIVE AMERICAN INDIAN TRIBES
* * *
(c) The recognition process shall require genealogical evidence of
Indigenous ancestry verified by independent experts and based upon input
from federally or internationally recognized Indigenous communities. In
addition, in order to be eligible for recognition, an applicant must file an
application with the Commission and demonstrate compliance with
subdivisions (1) through (8) of this subsection, which may be supplemented by
subdivision (9) of this subsection:
(1) A majority of the applicant’s members currently reside in a specific
geographic location within Vermont.
VT LEG #380973 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.362
2025 Page 4 of 18
(2) A substantial number of the applicant’s members are related to each
other by kinship and trace their ancestry to a kinship group through genealogy
or other methods. Genealogical documents shall be limited to include those
that show a descendency descendancy from identified Vermont or regional
native people.
(3) The applicant has a connection with Native American Indian tribes
and bands that have historically inhabited Vermont.
(4) The applicant has historically maintained an organizational structure
that exerts influence and authority over its members that is supported by
documentation of the structure, membership criteria, the names and residential
addresses of its members, and the methods by which the applicant conducts its
affairs.
(5) The applicant has an enduring community presence within the
boundaries of Vermont that is documented by archaeology, ethnography,
physical anthropology, history, folklore, or any other applicable scholarly
research and data.
(6) The applicant is organized in part:
(A) to preserve, document, and promote its Native American Indian
culture and history, and this purpose is reflected in its bylaws; and
(B) to address the social, economic, political, or cultural needs of the
members with ongoing educational programs and activities.
VT LEG #380973 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.362
2025 Page 5 of 18
(7) The applicant can document traditions, customs, oral stories, and
histories that signify the applicant’s Native American heritage and connection
to their historical homeland.
(8) The applicant has not been recognized as a tribe in any other state,
province, or nation.
(9) Submission of letters, statements, and documents from:
(A) municipal, State, or federal authorities that document the
applicant’s history of tribe-related business and activities; and
(B) tribes in and outside Vermont that attest to the Native American
Indian heritage of the applicant.
(d) The Commission shall consider the application pursuant to the
following process, which shall include at least the following requirements:
* * *
(3) A process for appointing a three-member review panel for each
application to review the supporting documentation and determine its
sufficiency, accuracy, and relevance. The review panel shall provide a detailed
written report of its findings and conclusions to the Commission, the applicant,
and legislative committees. Members of each review panel shall be appointed
cooperatively by the Commission and the applicant from a list of professionals
and academic scholars with expertise in cultural or physical anthropology,
Indian law, archaeology, Native American Indian genealogy, history, or
VT LEG #380973 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.362
2025 Page 6 of 18
another related Native American Indian subject area. If the applicant and the
Commission are unable to agree on a panel, the State Historic Preservation
Officer shall appoint the panel. No member of the review panel may be a
member of the Commission or affiliated with or on the tribal rolls of the
applicant No individual affiliated with or employed by a group or band
seeking formal State recognition as a Native American Indian tribe shall serve
on a review panel.
* * *
Sec. 4. 1 V.S.A. § 857 is added to read:
§ 857. RESTORATIVE JUSTICE FOR ODANAK ABENAKI
(a) The Commission shall consult with Odanak Abenaki leadership on all
matters relating to Indigenous policy and recognition of Native American
Indian tribes in Vermont.
(b) To support cultural revitalization, the Commission shall allocate grant
funding to projects led by the Odanak Abenaki, including cultural preservation
and education initiatives.
Sec. 5. STATE RECOGNITION OF NATIVE AMERICAN INDIAN
TRIBES TASK FORCE; REPORT
(a) Creation. There is created the State Recognition of Native American
Indian Tribes Task Force to review the validity of the prior recognition of
Native American Indian tribes by the State.
VT LEG #380973 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.362
2025 Page 7 of 18
(b) Membership. The Task Force shall be composed of the following
members:
(1) two current members of the House of Representatives, not all from
the same political party, who shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House;
(2) two current members of the Senate, not all from the same political
party, who shall be appointed by the Committee on Committees;
(3) two experts in Indigenous genealogy, who shall be appointed by the
Vermont Commission on Native American Affairs, in consultation with the
Executive Director of the Office of Racial Equity;
(4) one representative from the Odanak First Nation, who shall be
appointed by Odanak leadership;
(5) one representative from the Wôlinak First Nation, who shall be
appointed by Wôlinak leadership;
(6) one member of the public with expertise in the legal standards for
Indigenous recognition, who shall be appointed by the Governor; and
(7) one representative from the Vermont Attorney General’s Office,
who shall be appointed by the Attorney General and who will serve in an ex
officio, nonvoting capacity.
(c) Powers and duties. The Task Force shall study the validity of the prior
recognition of Native American Indian tribes by the State, with a focus on
VT LEG #380973 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.362
2025 Page 8 of 18
genealogical evidence and historical continuity and shall consider the
following questions:
(1) whether past recognition practices were consistent with best
practices and legal standards;
(2) whether the recission of any previous recognitions should be
recommended;
(3) what alternative pathways exist for cultural recognition while
ensuring historical integrity; and
(4) what impact State recognition has had on federal recognition efforts,
the allocation of State funding, and Indigenous cultural preservation.
(d) Assistance. The Task Force shall have administrative support from the
Office of Legislative Operations for the purpose of scheduling and staffing
meetings and from the Office of Legal Counsel for the purpose of providing
legal research and preparing recommended legislation. The Task Force may
also seek technical assistance from the Vermont Historical Society, the
University of Vermont and State Agricultural College, the University of
Ottawa, and recognized experts in Indigenous law.
(e) Report. On or before December 1, 2025, the Task Force shall submit an
interim written report to the House Committee on General and Housing, the
Senate Committee on Economic Development, Housing and General Affairs,
and the Governor with its findings and any recommendations for legislative
VT LEG #380973 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.362
2025 Page 9 of 18
action. On or before June 15, 2026, the Task Force shall submit a final written
report to the House Committee on General and Housing, the Senate Committee
on Economic Development, Housing and General Affairs, and the Governor
with its final conclusions and any further recommendations for legislative
action.
(f) Meetings.
(1) The representative from the Attorney General’s office shall call the
first meeting of the Task Force to occur on or before July 15, 2025.
(2) The Task Force shall select a chair from among its members at the
first meeting.
(3) A majority the voting members shall constitute a quorum.
(4) The Task Force shall meet a minimum of four times and not more
than six times.
(5) The Task Force shall cease to exist on June 30, 2026.
(g) Compensation and reimbursement.
(1) For attendance at meetings during adjournment of the General
Assembly, a legislative member of the Task Force serving in the member’s
capacity as a legislator shall be entitled to per diem compensation and
reimbursement of expenses pursuant to 2 V.S.A. § 23 for not more than six
meetings. These payments shall be made from monies appropriated to the
General Assembly.
VT LEG #380973 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.362
2025 Page 10 of 18
(2) Other members of the Task Force shall be entitled to per diem
compensation and reimbursement of expenses as permitted under
32 V.S.A. § 1010 for not more than six meetings. These payments shall be
made from monies appropriated to the General Assembly.
Sec. 6. 1 V.S.A. § 902 is amended to read:
§ 902. VERMONT TRUTH AND RECONCILIATION COMMISSION;
ESTABLISHMENT; ORGANIZATION
(a) There is created and established a body corporate and politic to be
known as the Vermont Truth and Reconciliation Commission to carry out the
provisions of this chapter. The Truth and Reconciliation Commission is
constituted a public instrumentality exercising public and essential government
functions and the exercise by the Commission of the power conferred by this
chapter shall be deemed and held to be the performance of an essential
governmental function.
(b)(1) The Commission shall consist of three commissioners appointed
pursuant to section 905 of this chapter and shall include one or more
committees established by the commissioners to examine institutional,
structural, and systemic discrimination caused or permitted by State laws and
policies experienced by each of the following populations and communities in
Vermont:
VT LEG #380973 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.362
2025 Page 11 of 18
(A) individuals who identify as Native American or Indigenous;
(B) individuals with a physical, psychiatric, or mental condition or
disability and the families of individuals with a physical, psychiatric, or mental
condition or disability;
(C) Black individuals and other individuals of color;
(D) individuals with French Canadian, French-Indian, or other mixed
ethnic or racial heritage; and
(E) individuals from marginalized communities, including Odanak
Abenaki, and other affected groups; and
(F) in the commissioners’ discretion, other populations and
communities that have experienced institutional, structural, and systemic
discrimination caused or permitted by State laws and policies.
(2)(A) Each committee shall consist of the commissioners and members
appointed by the commissioners in consultation with the populations and
communities identified pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection (b).
(B) The commissioners shall ensure that the members of each
committee shall be broadly representative of the populations and communities
who are the subject of that committees’ work. In addition, the commissioners
shall ensure that committee members:
(i) demonstrate expertise in Indigenous rights, reconciliation
processes, or systemic racism; and
VT LEG #380973 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.362
2025 Page 12 of 18
(ii) do not have direct ties to any group subject to an investigation
by the Commission.
* * *
Sec. 7. 1 V.S.A. § 906 is amended to read:
§ 906. POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE COMMISSIONERS
(a) Duties. The commissioners shall:
(1) establish, in consultation with the populations and communities
identified pursuant to subdivision 902(b)(1) of this chapter and other interested
parties in the commissioners’ discretion, committees to examine institutional,
structural, and systemic discrimination caused or permitted by State laws and
policies that have been experienced by the populations and communities
identified pursuant to subdivision 902(b)(1) of this chapter;
(2) determine, in consultation with the populations and communities
identified pursuant to subdivision 902(b)(1) of this chapter, historians, social
scientists, experts in restorative justice, and other interested parties in the
commissioners’ discretion, the scope and objectives of the work to be carried
out by each committee established pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
subsection;
(3) develop and implement a process for each committee established
pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection to fulfill the objectives
established pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection;
VT LEG #380973 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.362
2025 Page 13 of 18
(4) work with the committees and Commission staff to carry out
research, public engagement, and other work necessary to:
(A) identify and examine historic and ongoing institutional,
structural, and systemic discrimination against members of the populations and
communities identified pursuant to subdivision 902(b)(1) of this chapter that
has been caused or permitted by State laws and policies;
(B) determine the current status of members of the populations and
communities identified pursuant to subdivision 902(b)(1) of this chapter; and
(C) satisfy the scope of work and the objectives established pursuant
to subdivision (1) of this subsection (a);
(5) work with the committees and Commission staff to identify potential
programs and activities to create and improve opportunities for or to eliminate
disparities experienced by the populations and communities that are the subject
of the committees’ work;
(6) work with the committees and Commission staff to identify potential
educational programs related to historic and ongoing institutional, structural,
and systemic discrimination against members of the populations and
communities that are the subject of the committees’ work;
(7) work in consultation with the populations and communities
identified pursuant to subdivision 902(b)(1) of this chapter, experts in
restorative justice, and, in the commissioners’ discretion, other interested
VT LEG #380973 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.362
2025 Page 14 of 18
parties to ensure that the work of the Commission is open, transparent,
inclusive, and meaningful; and
(8) adopt global best practices by aligning the work of the Commission
and the committees with the principles outlined in the United Nations
Declaration on the Rights of Indigenous Peoples;
(9) include restorative justice to repair the harm caused to affected
communities and accountability for past errors by the Commission; and
(10) supervise the work of the Executive Director of the Commission.
* * *
Sec. 8. 1 V.S.A. § 908 is amended to read:
§ 908. REPORTS
* * *
(c) The Commission shall submit to the General Assembly a quarterly
report on progress, challenges, and expenditures.
(d) The Commission may, in its discretion, issue additional reports to the
Governor, General Assembly, and public.
Sec. 9. 1 V.S.A. § 911 is amended to read:
§ 911. DELIBERATIVE DISCUSSIONS; EXCEPTION TO OPEN
MEETING LAW
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of chapter 5, subchapter 2 of this title,
the deliberations of a quorum or more of the members of the Commission shall
VT LEG #380973 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.362
2025 Page 15 of 18
not be subject to the Vermont Open Meeting Law The Commission is subject
to the provisions of the Vermont Open Meeting Law in chapter 5, subchapter 2
of this title, except as provided in subsection 909(d) (private proceedings) and
section 912 (group sessions) of this chapter.
(b) The Commission shall regularly post to the Commission’s website a
short summary of all deliberative meetings held by the commissioners pursuant
to this subsection The Commission shall open its meetings to the public and
publish agendas, meeting minutes, and records of its decisions in accordance
with the Vermont Open Meeting Law.
(c)(1) As used in this section, “deliberations” means weighing, examining,
and discussing information gathered by the Commission and the reasons for
and against an act or decision.
(2) “Deliberations” expressly excludes:
(A) taking evidence, except as otherwise provided pursuant to section
909 of this chapter;
(B) hearing arguments for or against an act or decision of the
Commission;
(C) taking public comment; and
(D) making any decision related to an act or the official duties of the
Commission The Commission shall be subject to the penalty and enforcement
provisions of the Vermont Open Meeting Law for any violations of the law.
VT LEG #380973 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.362
2025 Page 16 of 18
Sec. 10. 1 V.S.A. § 913 is added to read:
§ 913. AUDIT; SCOPE; REPORT
(a) Scope. The State Auditor shall evaluate the operation and effectiveness
of the Commission including:
(1) the Commission’s compliance with the Vermont Open Meeting Law
and transparency standards;
(2) the integrity of the Commission’s past decisions, including potential
biases and exclusion of key voices;
(3) the effectiveness of the Commission’s recommendations in
achieving reconciliation goals; and
(4) any recommendations with respect to the scheduled repeal of the
Commission.
(b) Report. The Auditor shall submit a written report of the results of the
audit to the House Committee on General and Housing and the Senate
Committee on Economic Development, Housing and General Affairs on or
before December 15, 2026.
VT LEG #380973 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.362
2025 Page 17 of 18
Sec. 11. 1 V.S.A. § 914 is added to read:
§ 914. LEGISLATIVE OVERSIGHT COMMITTEE
(a) Creation. There is created the legislative Truth and Reconciliation
Commission Oversight Committee.
(b) Membership. The Committee shall be composed of the following
members:
(1) three members of the House of Representatives, not all from the
same political party, appointed by the Speaker of the House; and
(2) three members of the Senate, not all from the same political party,
appointed by the Committee on Committees.
(c) Chair. The Committee shall elect a chair and a vice chair from among
its members, one from each chamber, at the first meeting of each biennium.
(d) Meetings. The Committee shall meet at the call of the Chair a
minimum of three times when the General Assembly is in session and a
minimum of two times and a maximum of four times when the General
Assembly is not in session.
(e) Quorum. A majority of the membership of the Committee shall
constitute a quorum.
(f) Records. The Committee shall keep minutes of and record its meetings.
(g) Powers and duties. The Committee shall:
VT LEG #380973 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.362
2025 Page 18 of 18
(1) monitor the Commission’s compliance with transparency, public
access, and ethical standards;
(2) ensure reporting requirements are timely met;
(3) review complaints and concerns raised about the Commission’s
decisions and decision-making process;
(4) oversee the audit pursuant to section 913 of this chapter;
(5) recommend legislative changes if systemic issues emerge; and
(6) prepare for the prospective repeal of the Commission by ensuring an
appropriate transition of the Commission’s responsibilities.
(h) Assistance. The Committee shall have the assistance of the staff of the
Office of Legislative Counsel and of the Joint Fiscal Office.
(i) Reimbursement. For attendance at a meeting when the General
Assembly is not in session, members of the Committee shall be entitled to per
diem compensation and reimbursement of expenses pursuant to 2 V.S.A. § 23
for not more than four meetings.
Sec. 12. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380973 v.1